Louisiana, session 2026, SB434.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:602(5) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 602(13) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§602. Definition of terms
As used in this Part, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following
terms shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this Section:
* * *
(5) "Drug" includes all substances and preparations recognized in the official
compendium, as herein defined. It includes all substances and preparations intended
for use in the diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or beast, and all
substances and preparations, other than food and cosmetics, intended to affect the
structure or any function of the body. Drug also includes any food intended for
human consumption that intentionally contains a vaccine or vaccine material.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1102 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 434
* * *
(13) "Vaccine or vaccine material" means a substance that is:
(a) Intended for use in humans to stimulate the production of antibodies
and provide immunity against disease.
(b) Prepared from the causative agent of a disease, its products, or a
synthetic substitute treated to act as an antigen without inducing the disease.
(c) Authorized or approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.